Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 4
METROPOLITAN WATER DISTRICTS

32-4-401. Legislative declaration.

It is hereby declared that to provide for the conservation of all water resources of the state of Colorado and for the greatest beneficial use of all waters, surface and subsurface, within this state, the organization of metropolitan water districts and the construction of works as defined in this part 4 by such districts are a public use and will:

Be essentially for the public benefit and advantage of the people of the state of Colorado;

Indirectly benefit all industries of the state;

Indirectly benefit the state of Colorado in the increase of its taxable property valuation;

Directly benefit municipalities by providing adequate supplies of water for domestic use;

Directly benefit lands to be irrigated from works to be constructed;

Directly benefit lands under irrigation by stabilizing the flow of water in streams and by increasing flow and return of water to such streams; and

Promote the comfort, safety, and welfare of the people of the state of Colorado.

It is therefore declared to be the policy of the state of Colorado:

To investigate, acquire, control, and apply to beneficial use waters, surface and subsurface, originating in this state; and to provide for the direct and supplemental use of such waters for domestic, manufacturing, irrigation, power, and other beneficial uses;

To obtain from waters, surface and subsurface, originating in Colorado the highest duty for domestic uses and irrigation of lands in Colorado within the terms of interstate compacts;

To cooperate with the United States under the federal reclamation laws and with other agencies of the United States government for the construction and financing of works in the state of Colorado as defined in this part 4 and for the operation and maintenance thereof; and

To promote the greater prosperity and general welfare of the people of the state of Colorado by encouraging the organization of metropolitan water districts as provided in this part 4.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 578, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 89-13-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-1.

32-4-402. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"District" means a metropolitan water district organized under this part 4 either as originally organized or as changed from time to time.

(1.5) "Eligible elector" has the meaning specified in section 32-1-103 (5).

"Governing body" means the city council of a city, the board of trustees of an incorporated town, or the board of directors of a water and sanitation district, or any organization by law authorized to obligate itself for the purposes contemplated by this part 4.

"Municipality" means city, incorporated town, or water or water and sanitation districts; but in no event shall the word "municipality" include or refer to a city with a population in excess of three hundred thousand. The population of municipalities or unincorporated areas shall be determined by the latest federal census or state census or a local census directed by a city or a metropolitan water district.

"Ordinance" means a resolution in the case of water and sanitation districts.

"Publication" has the meaning specified in section 32-1-103 (15).

"Taxpaying elector" means "taxpaying elector" as defined in section

32-1-103

(23).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 890, § 130, effective January 1, 1993.)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 579, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 89-13-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-2.

L. 70:

p. 279, § 72.

L. 77:

(1.5) added and (5) and (6) R&RE, p. 1502, §§ 48, 49, effective July 15.

L. 81:

(1.5) and (5) amended, p. 1623, § 22, effective July 1, 1981.

L. 92:

(1.5) and (6) amended, p. 890, § 130, effective January 1, 1993.

32-4-403. Purpose, boundaries, and powers.

Metropolitan water districts may be organized under this part 4 for any one or more of the purposes set out in section 32-4-401 and may be formed of any two or more municipalities, if such municipalities are located in the same county or in adjacent or nearby counties. Unincorporated territory may become a part of a district as provided for in this part 4. When so organized, each such district shall be a governmental subdivision of the state of Colorado and a quasi-municipal corporation with such powers as are expressly granted in this part 4, together with such powers as are reasonably implied therefrom and necessary and proper to carry out the purpose of such district.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 580, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 89-13-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-3.

32-4-404. Organization.

A metropolitan water district shall be organized in the following manner:

The governing body of any municipality may enact an ordinance of a municipal corporation, and if other government subdivision a resolution, declaring that the public convenience and necessity require the organization of a metropolitan water district, which ordinance or resolution shall set forth the names of the municipalities to be in the proposed district and the name of the proposed district and boundary lines thereof, which boundaries shall be effective only for the six-month period under section 32-4-408 (5), and shall in no way limit future boundaries of the district as provided in this part 4.

Within ninety days after receipt of a copy of such ordinance from the initiating governing body, the governing body of any municipality which is named in the ordinance providing for the proposed district desiring to become a part of the district shall enact a similar ordinance, setting forth the same municipalities, name, and boundary.

Before final reading and enactment of such an ordinance, the governing body of each such municipality shall hold a public hearing thereon, notice of which shall be given by publication in at least one newspaper of general circulation within such city at least five days before the hearing. Each governing body in determining whether to enact the ordinance and become a part of the proposed district shall consider the existing water supply of said municipality and its adequacy or inadequacy for the present and future needs of such municipality and future additions thereto. Determination as to need by the governing body shall be final and conclusive.

The clerk of each governing body, upon the taking effect of such ordinance, shall forthwith transmit a certified copy thereof to the governing body of each other municipality named in the original ordinance to be a part of the proposed district and to the division of local government in the department of local affairs.

The director of the division of local government, upon a receipt of a copy of such ordinance from the governing body of each municipality named in the original ordinance to be a part of the proposed district, shall forthwith issue a certificate reciting that the district named in the ordinance has been duly organized according to the laws of the state of Colorado and setting forth the names of the municipalities which have certified an ordinance to his office as above provided. The organization of any district shall be deemed effective upon the date of issuance of such certificate, and the validity of the organization of any such district shall be incontestable in any suit or proceeding which has not been commenced within three months from such date. The director of said division shall forthwith transmit to the governing body of each municipality which has certified an adopting ordinance as provided in this section a copy of such certificate, and the clerk of each such governing body shall forthwith record such copy in the offices of the clerk and recorder of the county or counties in which the municipality is wholly or partly located. But, in no event shall the organization of any metropolitan water district be deemed effective nor shall the director of said division issue a certificate as above provided unless more than one-half of the municipalities named in the initiating ordinance have certified an ordinance to the director of said division as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (1).

Only such municipalities as do enact an ordinance to become a part of the district shall be joined therein.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 581, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 89-13-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-4.

L. 76:

(1)(d) and (1)(e) amended, p. 598, § 12, effective July 1.

32-4-405. Board of directors.

All powers, privileges, and duties vested in or imposed upon any district incorporated under this part 4 shall be exercised and performed by and through a board of directors; but the exercise of any executive, administrative, and ministerial powers may be by said board of directors delegated and redelegated to any of the offices created or by the board of directors acting under this part 4.

The board of directors shall consist of one member from each municipality which is within the boundaries of the district for each twenty-five thousand of population in the municipality, plus one member for each additional twenty-five thousand of population, or fraction thereof, from any municipality or unincorporated territory, which population shall be based upon the latest census. A board member from a municipality shall be appointed by the governing body of the municipality. A board member from unincorporated territory shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners of the county in which the unincorporated territory is located, but not more than one board member shall be appointed for each twenty-five thousand or fraction thereof of population within the unincorporated territory within the district in any one county. Board members shall be eligible electors residing within the district and within the municipality or unincorporated territory from which they are appointed.

The term of each member shall be two years, except that the terms of the members of the first board of directors shall be adjusted so that the terms of one-half the members shall expire one year after their appointment. At the first meeting of the board of directors of a newly formed district, the directors shall determine by lot which shall serve for one year terms and which shall serve for two year terms. At the expiration of a director's term a new appointment shall be made by the appropriate governing body and any member may be appointed to succeed himself.

A change of residence of a member of the board of directors to a place outside the area which the member represents shall automatically create a vacancy on the board of directors as to that area. Vacancies which may occur on the board of directors through death or resignation of one of the members or for any other reason shall be filled in the same manner as original members.

(4.5) Each member of the board may receive as compensation for his services a sum not to exceed nine hundred sixty dollars per annum, payable at a rate not to exceed thirty-five dollars per meeting.

The board of directors has the following powers:

To fix the time and place at which its regular meetings shall be held; to provide for the calling and holding of special meetings; and to organize, adopt bylaws and rules for procedure, and select a chairman and pro tem chairman. Notice of the time and place designated for all regular meetings shall be posted in at least three public places within the limits of the district, and, in addition, one such notice shall be posted in the county courthouse in the county or counties in which the district is located. Such notices shall remain posted and shall be changed in the event that the time or place of such regular meetings is changed. Special meetings may be called by any officer or member of the board by informing the other members of the date, time, and place of such special meeting, and the purpose for which it is called, and by posting as provided in this section at least three days previous to said meeting. All business of the board shall be conducted only during said regular or special meetings, and all said meetings shall be open to the public. All special and regular meetings of the board shall be held at locations which are within the boundaries of the district or which are within the boundaries of any county in which the district is located, in whole or in part, or in any county so long as the meeting location does not exceed twenty miles from the district boundaries. The provisions of this paragraph (a) governing the location of meetings may be waived only if the following criteria are met:

The proposed change of location of a meeting of the board appears on the agenda of a regular or special meeting of the board; and

A resolution is adopted by the board stating the reason for which a meeting of the board is to be held in a location other than under the provisions of this paragraph (a) and further stating the date, time, and place of such meeting.

To make and pass resolutions and orders not repugnant to the constitution of the United States or of the state of Colorado, or to the provisions of this part 4, necessary for the government and management of the affairs of the district for the execution of the powers vested in the district and for carrying into effect the provisions of this part 4. On all resolutions the roll shall be called and the ayes and noes recorded. Resolutions and orders may be adopted by viva voce vote but on demand of any member the roll shall be called. No resolution shall be adopted unless it has been introduced and discussed at a meeting previous to the time of such adoption.

All resolutions, as soon as may be after their passage, shall be recorded in a book kept for that purpose and be authenticated by the signature of the presiding officer of the board of directors and the clerk. All resolutions shall be published in the official newspaper within ten days of date of passage and adoption and shall become effective upon the date of publication.

No business shall be transacted unless a quorum of two-thirds of the total membership of a board of directors is present at a regular or special meeting; except that concerning all questions involving inclusion or exclusion of territories, or authorizing any expenditures in excess of ten thousand dollars, a majority vote of the entire membership shall be required.

To fix the location of the principal place of business of the district and the location of all offices and departments maintained under this part 4;

To prescribe by resolution a system of business administration and to create all necessary offices, and to establish and reestablish the powers and duties and compensation of all officers and employees and to require and fix the amount of all official bonds necessary for the protection of the funds and property of the district;

To delegate and redelegate, by resolution, to officers of the district, power to employ clerical, legal, and engineering assistance and labor, and under such conditions and restrictions as shall be fixed by the directors, power to bind the district by contract;

To prescribe a method of auditing and allowing or rejecting claims and demands and a method for the letting of contracts on a fair and competitive basis for the construction of works, structures, or equipment, or the performance or furnishing of labor, materials, or supplies as required for the carrying out of any of the purposes of this part 4; but in cases where the amount involved is ten thousand dollars or more, the board of directors shall provide for the letting of contract to the lowest responsible bidder, after publication in the official newspaper of notices inviting bids, subject to the right of said board to reject any and all proposals;

To constitute and appoint an official newspaper to be used for the official publications of the district, but nothing in this part 4 shall prevent the board from directing publication in additional newspapers where public necessity may so require.

Whenever the board of directors of the district is required by the provisions of this part 4 to determine the validity of a petition for inclusion and exclusion, the determination of such board shall be final and conclusive.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 582, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 89-13-5.

L. 61:

p. 518, § 5.

L. 63:

p. 690, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-5.

L. 70:

p. 279, § 73.

L. 77:

(4.5) added, p. 1502, § 50, effective July 15.

L. 90:

(5)(a) amended, p. 1497, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2) and (4) amended, p. 891, § 131, effective January 1, 1993.

32-4-406. Powers of districts.

Any district has the following powers:

To have perpetual existence;

To have and use a corporate seal;

To sue and be sued and be a party to suits, actions, and proceedings;

To enter into contracts and agreements affecting the affairs of the district, including but not limited to contracts with the United States and the state of Colorado and any of their agencies or instrumentalities;

To borrow money and incur indebtedness and to issue bonds and other evidence of the indebtedness; but no indebtedness shall be created in excess of the revenue which may reasonably be expected to be available to the district for the repayment thereof in the fiscal year in which the indebtedness is to be created without first submitting, at an election held for that purpose, the proposition of creating the indebtedness. Any election may be held separately or may be held jointly or concurrently with any primary or general election held under the laws of the state of Colorado. The resolution calling the election shall recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the amount of principal of the indebtedness, the maximum net effective interest rate to be paid on such indebtedness, and the terms of repayment. The resolution shall also designate the date upon which such election shall be held and the form of the ballot. The election shall be held and conducted as provided in articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

To purchase, trade, exchange, acquire, buy, sell, and otherwise dispose of and encumber real and personal property, water, water rights, water works and plants, and any interest therein, including leases and easements;

To refund any bonded indebtedness of the district without an election. The terms and conditions of refunding bonds shall be substantially the same as those of an original issue of bonds.

In addition to all other means of providing revenue, as provided in this part 4, to levy and collect ad valorem taxes on and against all taxable property within the district. The board of directors, in each year, shall determine the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation, taking into consideration other sources of revenue of the district, and shall fix a rate of levy which shall not exceed six mills which, when levied upon every dollar of the valuation for assessment of taxable property within the district and with other revenue, will raise the amount required by the district annually to supply funds for the constructing, operating, and maintaining of the works and equipment of the district and promptly to pay in full, when due, all interest on and principal of bonds and other obligations of the district, and in event of accruing defaults or deficiencies an additional levy may be made. The board of directors, in accordance with the schedule prescribed by section 39-5-128, C.R.S., shall certify to the board of county commissioners of each county wherein the district has any territory the rate so fixed, with directions that, at the time and in the manner required by law for levying taxes for other purposes, such board of county commissioners shall levy such tax upon the valuation for assessment of all taxable property within the district, in addition to such other taxes as may be levied by such board of county commissioners.

To hire and retain agents, employees, engineers, and attorneys;

To have and exercise the power of eminent domain and, in the manner provided by law for the condemnation of private property for public use, to take any property necessary to exercise the powers granted in this part 4, either within or without the district. In exercising the power of eminent domain, the procedure established and prescribed in articles 1 to 7 of title 38, C.R.S., shall be followed.

To construct and maintain works and establish and maintain facilities within or without the district, across or along any public street or highway, or in, upon, under, or over any vacant public lands, which public lands are the property of the state of Colorado, or across any stream of water or watercourse; except that the district shall promptly restore any such street or highway to its former state of usefulness as nearly as may be, and shall not use the same in such manner as to completely or unnecessarily impair the usefulness thereof;

To fix and, from time to time, increase or decrease water rates and to pledge such revenue for the payment of any indebtedness of the district;

To sell developed water subject to conditions determined by the board for domestic, municipal, irrigation, and industrial uses at a rate to be determined as fair and reasonable in accordance with recognized and established principles of rate determination;

To appropriate revenues for the purpose of carrying on investigations and searches for the determination of potential sources of water, surface and subsurface;

To invest any surplus money in the district treasury, including such money in any sinking fund established for the purpose of retiring bonds, not required for the immediate necessities of the district in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., and such investment may be made by direct purchase of any such securities at the original sale of the same or by the subsequent purchase of such securities. Any securities thus purchased and held may, from time to time, be sold and the proceeds reinvested in securities, as provided in this section. Sales of any securities thus purchased and held shall, from time to time, be made in season so that the proceeds may be applied to the purposes for which the money with which the securities were originally purchased was placed in the treasury of the district.

To manufacture and sell electrical power to public and private corporations, as incidental to the foregoing purposes;

To deposit moneys of the district not then needed in the conduct of district affairs in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S. For the purpose of making such deposits, the board of directors may appoint, by written resolution, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the district. Such persons shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board requires.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 584, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 89-13-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-6.

L. 77:

(1)(e) and (1)(h) amended, p. 1503, § 51, effective July 15.

L. 79:

(1)(q) added, p. 1624, § 34, effective June 8.

L. 89:

(1)(o) amended, p. 1118, § 36, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(e) amended, p. 891, § 132, effective January 1, 1993.

32-4-407. Inclusion of territory.

The boundaries of any district organized under the provisions of this part 4 may be changed in the manner prescribed in this part 4, but the change of boundaries of the district shall not impair or affect its organization or its rights in or to property, or any of its rights or privileges whatsoever; nor shall it affect or impair or discharge any contract obligation, lien, or charge for or upon which it might be liable or chargeable had such change of boundaries not been made. The incorporated areas of cities, towns, water districts, and unincorporated areas lying within the boundaries of any district organized under this part 4, as established by the original ordinances of initiating municipalities and from time to time by action of the board of directors, may be added to the district.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 587 (Art. II).

CRS 53:

§ 89-13-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-7.

32-4-408. Unincorporated territory.

Territory shall be eligible for inclusion in a district, as provided for in this part 4, if such territory is not embraced within a municipality and is within the area encompassed by the district at the time of its organization, or is a territory which may feasibly become a part of the district, as determined by the board of directors.

Proceedings for inclusion in a district of territory eligible, as defined in subsection (1) of this section, may be initiated by a written petition presented to the board of directors of the district to which it is proposed to join. The petition must meet the following requirements:

It shall be signed by the owners of more than fifty percent of the area of such territory proposed to be included.

It shall be signed by more than fifty percent of the owners of the area proposed to be included, whether the owners are residents or nonresidents of such area.

The circulator of each petition, which may consist of one or more sheets, shall sign an affidavit attesting that each signature is the signature of the person whose name it purports to be.

Each signature shall be accompanied by the resident address of the signer, the date of signature, and a description of the property owned by the signer.

It shall contain the verified statement of petitioners:

That the proposed area is eligible for inclusion, as provided in this section; as to the number of owners of the entire area proposed to be included; and that the petition complies with the requirements contained in this section; and

A request for inclusion into the district.

No petition shall be valid for the purposes of this part 4 if any signature on the petition is dated more than one hundred eighty days prior to the date of the filing of the petition.

No person signing the petition shall be permitted to withdraw his or her signature from the petition.

The petition shall be accompanied by four copies of a map or plat of the territory showing, with reasonable certainty, the territory to be included, the boundaries thereof, and its relationship to the then boundaries of the district, together with a certified statement of current ownership of all property proposed to be included, which certified statement is to be prepared by a licensed and bonded abstract company.

If the board of directors of said district finds that the petition and the documents attached thereto meet the requirements of this section, the inclusion of such territory to such district shall be accomplished as follows:

By accepting said petition and approving the inclusion of said territory;

By causing to be published in the official newspaper of the district a notice of the filing of said petition, its acceptance and approval by the board of directors, and a notice of the time and place of a public hearing at which all interested persons may be heard on the proposition of including such territory in the district, such public hearing to be held not less than twenty days nor more than forty days from the date of first publication;

The board of directors shall hold a public hearing at the time and place stated in the notice. In determining whether the territory shall be included in the district, the board of directors shall consider the needs and requirements of the territory proposed to be included, together with the needs and requirements of the district.

If the board of directors determines to include said territory, it shall cause a resolution to be passed, and the inclusion of territory shall be completed and effective on the effective date of the inclusion resolution for all purposes except that of general taxation, in which respect it shall not become effective until on or after January first next ensuing.

The board of directors shall cause a certified copy of said resolution to be forthwith transmitted to the division of local government in the department of local affairs and shall cause to be recorded a certified copy of such inclusion resolution in the office of the clerk and recorder of the county wherein such included territory is located.

Proceedings for inclusion in a metropolitan water district of territory eligible, as defined above, may be initiated by a written petition presented to the board of directors of the metropolitan water district to which it is proposed to join, together with a cash deposit sufficient to defray all costs of inclusion proceedings, including the election. The petition must be signed by not less than fifty taxpaying electors of the territory proposed to be included.

The board of directors may then accept the petition and, by resolution, approve the inclusion of the territory in the district. The board will then transmit to the district court of the county in which the area is located, or to the district court of either of the counties if the area is located in more than one county, the original petition, a certified copy of its resolution accepting and approving the inclusion, and the cash deposit to guarantee costs.

Repealed.

Upon presentation of the resolution, the court shall examine it, and, if the court finds that the requirements of this section have been substantially complied with, the court shall forthwith call an election of the electors of the territory proposed to be included, to be held at some convenient place within the territory, which shall be held and conducted as provided in articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

The notice of election shall specify the time and place of the election, shall contain a description of the boundaries of the territory proposed to be included, and shall state that the description and a map or plat thereof are on file in the office of the board of directors of the district, and shall meet the requirements for notice in section 1-5-203, C.R.S.

Repealed.

The court shall allow each commissioner a reasonable compensation for his services as such.

If such inclusion is not approved at said election, the court shall enter its order and decree that such territory shall not be included within the area of the district. If such inclusion is approved at said election, the court by an order shall decree that such territory shall be included in the district, and certified copies of such order and decree shall be transmitted to the said district, to the office of the clerk and recorder in which said territory is located, and to the division of local government, and such inclusion shall be complete on the effective date of the court's order and decree for all purposes except that of general taxation, in which respect it shall not become effective until on and after January 1 next ensuing.

All costs and expenses connected with such inclusion proceedings and including the commissioners' fees and all election expenses shall be paid by the petitioners initiating the inclusion proceedings.

Any unincorporated area lying within the proposed water district, as originally organized, may file its petition for inclusion with the board of directors of said district and, if said petition is filed within six months from the date of organization of said district, such petition shall be granted. Upon receipt of such petition the board of directors shall follow procedures set forth in paragraphs (c), (d), and (e) of subsection (3) of this section.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 587, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 89-13-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-8.

L. 70:

p. 280, § 75.

L. 71:

p. 961, § 4.

L. 76:

(3)(e) and (4)(i) amended, p. 598, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(4)(c), (4)(f), and (4)(g) repealed and (4)(d) and (4)(e) amended, pp. 1516, 1503, §§ 88, 52, effective July 15.

L. 92:

(2), (4)(a), (4)(b), (4)(d), and (4)(e) amended, p. 891, § 133, effective January 1, 1993.

32-4-409. Inclusion of incorporated areas.

The municipalities as defined in this part 4 shall be eligible for inclusion in a metropolitan water district if such municipality is contiguous to the area encompassed by the district or is a territory which may feasibly become a part of the district as determined by the board of directors.

The governing body of such municipality shall, before finally enacting an ordinance declaring that the public convenience and necessity, require the inclusion of a part or all of the territory within the boundaries of such municipality into such metropolitan water district. Said resolution or ordinance shall set forth boundaries of the territory proposed to be included, except that:

The governing body of such municipality, before finally adopting such resolution or enacting such ordinance, shall cause a notice of public hearing to be published, which public hearing shall be held not less than twenty days nor more than forty days from the date of first publication, and shall state the time and place of such hearing, and that the matter of inclusion in a metropolitan water district will be considered.

The governing body shall hold a public hearing at the time and place stated in the notice. In determining whether the territory shall be included in the district, the governing body shall consider the present and future needs and requirements of the municipality proposed to be included. Upon the effective date of such ordinance or resolution, the clerk of the governing body of such municipality shall forthwith transmit a certified copy thereof to the board of directors of such district and to the division of local government in the department of local affairs.

Within sixty days after receipt of a copy of such resolution, the board of directors of such district may enact a similar resolution setting forth the same boundaries and upon the effective date of said resolution shall cause a certified copy thereof to be transmitted to the division of local government and to the clerk of the governing body of such municipality. The director of said division, upon receipt of a copy of a resolution of the board of directors of such district, shall forthwith issue a certificate reciting that the territory described in such resolution has been duly added to the district according to the laws of the state of Colorado. The inclusion of such territory shall be deemed effective upon the date of issuance of such certificate, and the validity of such inclusion shall be incontestable in any suit or proceeding which shall not have been commenced within three months from such date. The director of said division shall forthwith transmit to the governing body of such municipality and to the board of directors of such district a copy of such certificate, and the clerk of such governing body shall forthwith record such copy in the office of the clerk and recorder of the county in which such municipality is located.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 591, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 89-13-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-9.

L. 76:

(2)(b) and (3) amended, p. 599, § 14, effective July 1.

32-4-410. Exclusion of unincorporated areas.

The owner in fee of any lands constituting a portion of the district may file with the board a petition praying that such lands be excluded and taken from said district.

Such petition shall meet the following requirements:

Shall be signed by the owners of more than sixty percent of the area of such territory proposed to be excluded;

Shall be signed by more than sixty percent of the owners of the area proposed to be excluded, whether such owners are residents or nonresidents of such area.

Such petition shall be accompanied by a deposit of money sufficient to pay all costs of the exclusion proceedings, together with a certified statement of current ownership of all property proposed to be included, said certificate to be prepared by an attorney, a title insurance company, or title insurance agent authorized to do business in this state.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 592, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 89-13-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-10.

L. 83:

(3) amended, p. 512, § 2, effective May 16.

32-4-411. Exclusion election.

Upon receipt of the petition, the board of directors shall certify, by proper resolution, the petition to the district court of the county in which the territory is located, and the district court shall thereupon proceed to the appointment of a designated election official to hold an election, as provided in section 32-4-408 (4). On the effective date of the ordinance or resolution, the clerk of the governing body of the municipality shall forthwith transmit a certified copy thereof to the board of directors of the district and to the division of local government in the department of local affairs.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 593, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 89-13-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-11.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 599, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2180, § 46, effective June 2; entire section amended, p. 893, § 134, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by House Bill 92-1359 and House Bill 92-1333 were harmonized.